North Dakota, session 69, HB1011.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds
as may be necessary, are appropriated from special funds, to the securities department for the
purpose of defraying the expenses of the securities department, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $2,412,763 $274,224 $2,686,987
New and vacant FTE pool 0 58,172 58,172
Operating expenses 756,430 (113,259) 643,171
Total special funds $3,169,193 $219,137 $3,388,330
Full-time equivalent positions 10.00 0.00 10.00
SECTION 2. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The
securities department may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line
item in section 1 of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer
funds from the new and vacant FTE pool line item to the salaries and wages line item in
accordance with the guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as
approved by the sixty-ninth legislative assembly.
Page No. 1 25.0155.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Subsection 8 of section 10-04-10 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
8. Fees. The fee, which must accompany the application, for registration, transfer, or
notice filing, and for each annual renewal thereof is:
a. For each broker-dealer $200.00$240
b. For each agent $60.00$75
c. For each investment adviser or federal covered adviser $100.00$120
d. For each investment adviser representative $50.00$60
An application to register as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment
adviser representative may, with the consent of the commissioner, be withdrawn upon
written application.
Page No. 2 25.0155.02000